hebrules.regex
!שלמים: no rules are required, luckily

!חפנ: in PEL: Eliminates the n in future tense
K n -> 0 || %+PEL 3 ?* _
.o.

!נפא: elimination of A & change of vowel to o in future tense
vowel K A -> o || %+PEL 3 ?* _
.o.

!נפיו: elimination of y & change of adjacent vowel in future tense.
!		Chage of second vowel to e in fut tense except in root {yjn}
!vowel -> e || %+PEL 3 ?* _ K y|w
!.o.
K y -> 0 || %+PEL 3 ?* _
.o.
K w -> 0 || %+PEL 3 ?* _
.o.

!נעוי: elimination of y & w, fixing of reduplication of vowels
!e -> 0 || %+PEL 2 ?* T y _
!.o.
!e t -> a || %+PEL 2 ?* T y L ? _
!.o.
!o T y|w -> a || %+PEL 2 ?* _
!.o.
!a a -> a
!.o.
!vowel -> a || %+PEL 3 ?* _ K ? T y
!.o.
!e -> i || %PEL 3 ?* K ? _ T y
!.o.
!T y|w -> 0 || %+PEL ?* _
!.o.

!נלא

!נליה

!mid-vowel elimination when 2-letters roots occur in PEL, except Pres-Fem-Sg
vowel -> 0 || %+PEL \2 ?* vowel T ? _ L ? vowel
.o.


!elimination of markings
%+PEL | 1 | 2 | 3 |K | T | L -> 0 .o.

!trial & error

?*;
